Missouri, session 2026, HB2648.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 650, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 650.2100, to read as follows:
650.2100. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Center", the organized retail theft coordination center established under
this section;
(2) "Department", the department of public safety;
(3) "Organized retail theft", as such term is defined under subsection 12 of
section 570.030.
2. There is hereby established in the department of public safety the "Organized
Retail Theft Coordination Center". The duties of the center shall include the following:
(1) Coordinating state law enforcement duties relating to organized retail theft,
including investigations of national and transnational criminal organizations that are
engaged in organized retail theft in Missouri;
(2) Establishing relationships with state and local law enforcement agencies and
organizations, including organized retail crime associations and cargo theft associations,
and sharing information regarding organized retail theft threats with such agencies and
organizations;
(3) Assisting state and local law enforcement agencies with state and local
investigations of organized retail theft groups;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2648 2
(4) Establishing relationships with retail, transportation, and other companies
determined by the director of the department of public safety to have significant
interests relating to organized retail theft threats, sharing information with those
companies regarding such threats, collaborating on investigations and loss prevention
activities as appropriate, and providing a mechanism for the receipt of investigative
information on such threats;
(5) Establishing a secure system for sharing information regarding organized
retail theft threats by leveraging existing information systems at the Missouri state
highway patrol;
(6) Tracking trends with respect to organized retail theft and releasing annual
public reports on such trends; and
(7) Supporting the provision of training and technical assistance.
3. The director of the department of public safety shall appoint a director to
serve as the head of the center, who shall be an experienced law enforcement officer.
The director of the center shall be assisted by a deputy director, who shall be appointed
by the director of the center, to serve for a term of two years. Subject to appropriations,
the director of the center may hire additional staff as necessary to carry out the duties of
the center.
4. The center shall coordinate its activities, as appropriate, with state agencies
and centers responsible for countering transnational organized crime threats. The
director of the center, or his or her designee, may enter into agreements with federal,
state, and local agencies, and with private sector entities, to facilitate carrying out the
duties described under subsection 2 of this section.
5. Subject to approval by the director of the center, information that would
otherwise be subject to the limitation of disclosure under chapter 610 may be shared if
such disclosure is operationally necessary. The director of the center shall not delegate
his or her authority under this subsection.
6. (1) The director of the department of public safety, in consultation with the
attorney general, shall conduct an evaluation of existing state programs that provide
grants, training, and technical support to federal, state, and local law enforcement
agencies to assist such entities in countering organized retail theft. After completion of
such evaluation, and no later than March 1, 2027, the director of the department of
public safety and the attorney general shall submit a joint report to the general
assembly that:
(a) Describes the result of such evaluation; and
(b) Includes recommendations on ways to expand grants, training, and technical
assistance aimed at combatting organized retail theft in the state.

HB 2648 3
(2) Within forty-five days of the submission of the report required under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the director of the department of public safety and the
attorney general shall jointly issue formal guidance to relevant agencies and offices
within the department of public safety for modifying or expanding, as appropriate, the
prioritization of training and technical assistance designed to counter organized retail
theft.
7. On or before August 28, 2027, the director of the department of public safety
shall submit a report regarding the establishment of the center to the chair of the house
judiciary committee and to the chair of the senate judiciary committee. The report shall
include a description of:
(1) The organizational structure of the center;
(2) The agencies and partner organizations that are represented within the
center;
(3) Any challenges required to be addressed while establishing the center;
(4) Any lessons learned from establishing the center, including successful
prosecutions resulting from the activities of the center;
(5) Recommendations for ways to strengthen the enforcement of laws involving
organized retail theft;
(6) The intersections and commonalities between organized retail crime
organizations and other organized theft groups, including supply chain diversion and
theft; and
(7) The impact of organized theft groups on the scarcity of vital products,
including medicines, personal protective equipment, and infant formula.
8. On or before August 28, 2028, and each year thereafter, the director of the
department of public safety shall submit an annual report to the general assembly that
describes the activities of the center during the previous year.
9. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 2648 4
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔